Utah statutes.
30-1-14.   Acting without authority -- Impersonation -- Forgery -- Penalty.

A person is guilty of a third degree felony if he:

(1)  knowingly solemnizes a marriage in violation of either Section 30-1-6, 30-1-7, or 30-1-9.1;

(2)  impersonates a parent or guardian of a minor to obtain a license for the minor to marry; or

(3)  forges the name of a parent or guardian of a minor on any writing purporting to give consent to a marriage of a minor.

